Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1408
Municipality; state; joint facility; agreement authorized.

Whenever any municipality has entered into an agreement with the state pursuant to the provisions of section 72-1405, the state may construct a building or facility for its use which may be used, operated and maintained jointly with the building or facility of the municipality made available to the state as authorized herein, and the state and the municipality are authorized to enter into an agreement for that purpose.

Laws 1967, c. 464, § 8, p. 1442.